West Virginia, session 2025, HB2932.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-3-9. State Department of Education. For carrying into effect the provisions of this chapter, the state Superintendent of Schools shall maintain a Department of Education at his or her office at the state Capitol, and he or she shall have authority to may employ assistants and such other employees as may be necessary:  Provided, That there may be no more than one associate state superintendent of schools position.